New Jersey, session 222, S3464.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2004, c.88 (C.19:61-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    There is hereby established in the Department of the Treasury a special, nonlapsing fund to be known as the Federal Elections Assistance Fund. The fund is established in accordance with paragraph (b) of section 254 of Pub.L.107-252, (42 U.S.C.15404) for the purpose of receiving: a.     all moneys appropriated or otherwise made available by the State for the purpose of carrying out the activities required by Pub.L.107-252; b.    all payments which will be received from the federal government pursuant to Pub.L.107-252; c.     interest earned on deposits made in the fund; and d.    such other additional amounts as may be appropriated under federal or State law. The State Treasurer is authorized to transfer into the fund in a timely manner such State moneys as will be necessary to insure that the State qualifies for the maximum amount of federal funds appropriated to implement Pub.L.107-252. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, at least half of federal funds appropriated to the State in accordance with Pub.L.107-252 during the 15 years following the effective date of P.L.   , c.    (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be allocated by the State Treasurer for the purpose of replacing voting machines with a voting system that provides a paper record of each vote cast. (cf: P.L.2004, c.88, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Under the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002, Pub.L.107-252, also known as HAVA, the federal government allocated to the State funding for modernizing various aspects of the elections process.  This bill provides that at least half of any future funds allocated to the State under HAVA during the 15 years following the bills effective date would be used to replace current voting machines with a voting system that provides a paper record of each vote cast.